Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2230YC (2) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (a) Are in tracts of two forty or more contiguous acres. 4